Utah statutes.
61-1-16.   False statements unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to make or cause to be made, in any document filed with the division or in any proceeding under this chapter, any statement which is, at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it is made, false or misleading in any material respect.



Amended by Chapter 284, 1983 General Session

